Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-812
Tax list; delivered to city treasurer; errors.

As soon as the assessment roll shall have been equalized, and the annual levy made thereon, the city clerk shall immediately make out a tax list, which shall be as nearly as practicable in the form prescribed by law for the tax list to be furnished county treasurers, and he shall deliver such tax list to the city treasurer on or before the first day of October next after the date of the levy in each year. Errors in the name of persons assessed may be corrected by the treasurer and the tax collected from the person intended, and in case the treasurer finds that any land has been omitted in the assessment, he shall report that fact to the council, who may assess the same and direct the correction of the tax list as provided in this section and in section 15-811.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 123, p. 123;

R.S.1913, § 4550;

C.S.1922, § 3940;

C.S.1929, § 15-811;

R.S.1943, § 15-812.